Georgia, session 2025_26, HB336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to student health in elementary and secondary education, is amended by adding a
new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-771.3.
(a) If a local board of education provides information on immunizations, infectious
diseases, medications, or other school health issues to parents and guardians of students in
grades six through 12, then the following information about sickle cell disease shall be
included:
(1) A description of sickle cell disease;
H. B. 336
- 1 -

LC 49 2085
(2) A description of the risk factors and warning signs associated with sickle cell disease;
(3) A recommendation to the parent or guardian of those students displaying warning
signs associated with sickle cell disease that such parent or guardian consult with the
student's primary care provider to determine if immediate screening for sickle cell disease
is appropriate;
(4) A description of the screening processes for sickle cell disease; and
(5) A recommendation that, following a sickle cell disease diagnosis, the parent or
guardian consult with the student's primary care provider to develop an appropriate
treatment plan.
(b) The Department of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Public Health,
shall develop and make available the information about sickle cell disease to local school
systems as required under subsection (a) of this Code section in an efficient manner that
shall include posting the information on its public website."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 336
- 2 -